Louisiana, session 2026, SB341.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 12:1853, the introductory paragraph of 1854, 1854(3) and (7), the
introductory paragraph of 1855(B)(1), 1855(B)(2)(b)(xiii), 1856(A)(3) and (4), and 1870 are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 12:1855(A)(5)(c) and 1856(H) are hereby enacted:
§1853. Authorization; requirements; regulation
A. Two or more churches or nonprofit religious organizations or one or more
religious denominations may agree to pool their liabilities for the purposes of
providing property commercial coverage for their buildings and other properties,
so long as they have a positive net worth, are financially solvent, and are capable of
assuming the obligations set forth in this Chapter.
B. Pools may also be created for commercial coverages that are
analogous to commercial property insurance in the private market as approved
by the commissioner.
B.C. The department shall promulgate necessary rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement and regulate the activities authorized in
this Chapter.
§1854. Definitions
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 341 ENROLLED
Wherever used in this Chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears in
the context, the following terms, whether used in the singular or plural, shall have
the following meanings For the purposes of this Chapter the following terms
have the following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Fund" means the self-insurance fund established pursuant to this Chapter
to provide property insurance commercial coverage for churches and nonprofit
religious organizations and shall be known as the Louisiana Churches and Nonprofit
Religious Organizations Self-Insured Fund.
* * *
(7) "Property Commercial coverage" means coverage for the damage or loss
of a structure or building and may include any or all of but is not limited to the
following:
(a) Premises liability coverage.
(b) Contents coverage for furniture or equipment.
(c) Wind and hail coverage.
(d) Loss of use coverage.
(e) Medical payments coverage.
* * *
§1855. Agreement to pool liabilities; initial financial requirements
A. * * *
(5) * * *
(c) Except as otherwise provided in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
original books, records, documents, accounts, and vouchers, or reproductions
thereof, shall be preserved and kept in this state for the purpose of examination
and until the authority to destroy or otherwise dispose of the records is secured
from the department. All original records or certified reproductions or records
originally received in a digital or electronic format shall be maintained for the
period commencing on the first day following the last period examined by the
department through the subsequent examination period, or five years,
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 341 ENROLLED
whichever is longer.
* * *
B.(1) The fund shall submit to the department an application, on an
application form prescribed and furnished by the department, for authority to act as
a group self-insurance fund for property commercial coverage. Each application
shall include evidence of the fund's inception, which establishes financial strength
and liquidity of the members to pay claims promptly and support the financial ability
of the fund to satisfy its obligations upon the establishment of the fund, including all
of the following:
* * *
(2) The application shall be in writing, on a form provided by the department,
and shall comply with all of the following:
* * *
(b) All applications shall be accompanied by the following items:
* * *
(xiii) Proof of advance A pledge to make an advance payment to the fund
by each initial member of the fund of not less than twenty-five percent of that
member's first year estimated annually earned normal premiums prior to the fund
providing coverage. If the fund provides coverage prior to every initial member
of the fund making the advance payment pledged pursuant to this Item, the
commissioner shall suspend the fund's certificate or authority until every initial
member of the fund has made his pledged advance payment, and the
commissioner may take additional regulatory action as authorized in this
Chapter.
* * *
§1856. Requirements; excess insurance; administrative and service companies;
status; liability; refunds
A. The fund established pursuant to this Chapter shall comply with all of the
following items:
* * *
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 341 ENROLLED
(3) Provide property commercial coverage as required by this Chapter.
(4)(a) Maintain, on a fund-year basis, a contract or contracts of specific
excess insurance or reinsurance of not less than an amount that is actuarially sound
and approved by the department. The maximum retention under the excess insurance
or reinsurance contracts shall not exceed amounts as may be provided authorized
by the department.
(b) For purposes of authorizing the purchase of reinsurance as required by
this Subsection, the fund shall be deemed an insurer. The excess insurance or
reinsurance shall be purchased only from a company having a rating of A- by A.M.
Best Rating Services, Inc., A- by Fitch Ratings, A by Weiss Ratings, A- by S&P
Global Ratings, or A3 by Moody's Investors Service, or better, and this reinsurance
may be purchased from admitted or nonadmitted companies, provided that the
reinsurance purchase complies with the provisions of R.S. 22:651 through 661,
and Financial Accounting Standard Number 113 as promulgated and updated by the
Financial Accounting Standards Board. The department shall approve all excess
insurance policies or reinsurance agreements prior to use by the fund.
* * *
H. All members of the fund shall establish and maintain an aggregate
loss fund or a stop loss provision as part of the excess insurance policy
placements in an amount equivalent to not more than one year's premium for
each risk underwritten. The trust fund for each risk underwritten shall
maintain a cash reserve for each coverage year sufficient to cover payment of
the entire aggregate loss fund, as defined in the applicable excess insurance
policy or policies for that risk.
* * *
§1870. Jurisdiction
A. Except as otherwise provided in Subsection B of this Section, The the
Nineteenth Judicial District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over any civil or
criminal proceeding instituted pursuant to this Chapter.
B. The fund and a member of the fund may contractually agree, through
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 341 ENROLLED
a policy of insurance or otherwise, to resolve a claim dispute through mediation
pursuant to the Louisiana Mediation Act, R.S. 9:4101 et seq., or appraisal
pursuant to R.S. 22:1807.11 et seq.
Section 2. R.S. 12:1855(A)(5)(b) and 1856(E) are hereby repealed.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute, pursuant to its statutory authority, is
hereby directed to change "property coverage" to "commercial coverage" in Chapter 28 of
Title 12 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.